Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1544
Public place, defined.

Public place shall mean any place or area in the state that is used or held out for use by the public, whether owned or operated by public or private interests.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 11.
September 30, 2025